North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.3 Child Welfare

Source:

S.L. 2021, hb1035, § 23, effective August 1, 2021.

27-20.3-01.
Definitions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause:

To communicate with the child; or

To provide for the care and support of the child as required by law; or

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

Willfully to fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Abandoned infant” means a child who has been abandoned before reaching the age of one year.

“Aggravated circumstances” means circumstances in which a parent:

Abandons, tortures, chronically abuses, or sexually abuses a child;

Fails to make substantial, meaningful efforts to secure treatment for the parent’s addiction, mental illness, behavior disorder, or any combination of those conditions for one year;

Engages in conduct prohibited under sections 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-08 or chapter 12.1-27.2, in which a child is the victim or intended victim;

Engages in conduct that constitutes one of the following crimes, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements:

A violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, 12.1-16-03, or 14-09-22 in which the victim is another child of the parent;

Aiding, abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting a violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03 in which the victim is a child of the parent; or

A violation of section 12.1-17-02 in which the victim is a child of the parent and has suffered serious bodily injury;

Engages or attempts to engage in conduct, prohibited under sections 12.1-17-01 through 12.1-17-04, in which a child is the victim or intended victim;

In the case of a child age nine or older, has been incarcerated under a sentence for which the latest release date is after the child’s age of majority;

Subjects the child to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner; or

Allows the child to be present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2.

“Attendant care” means a nonsecure holdover site for children in need of services who are in the custody of law enforcement and need constant short-term supervision on a preadjudicatory basis.

“Child in need of protection” means a child who:

Is without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and the need for services or protection is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned by the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Is without proper parental care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of the child’s parent or parents, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission by the child’s parents, and care is requested by a parent;

Is in need of treatment and whose parents, guardian, or other custodian have refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Child in need of services” means a child who:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school subject to compulsory school attendance and is absent from school without an authorized excuse more than three days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child’s parent, guardian, or other custodian, including running away, and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Has committed an offense applicable only to a child, except for an offense committed by a minor fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution; or

Is under the age of fourteen years and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, “electronic smoking device” and “alternative nicotine product” have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03; and

In any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, which stands in loco parentis to the child and a person to which legal custody of the child has been given by order of a court.

“Diversion” means an intervention strategy that redirects a child away from formal processing in the juvenile justice system, while still holding the child accountable for that child’s actions.

“Fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual” means a relative or other individual who has been determined, after consideration of an assessment that includes a criminal history record investigation under chapter 50-11.3, to be a qualified individual under chapters 27-20.1 and 30.1-27, and who consents in writing to act as a legal guardian.

“Home” as used in the phrase “to return home” means the abode of the child’s parent with whom the child formerly resided.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department of human services.

“Permanency hearing” means a hearing, conducted with respect to a child who is in foster care, to determine the permanency plan for the child which includes the following:

Whether and, if applicable, when the child will be returned to the parent.

Whether and, if applicable, when the child will be placed for adoption and the state will file a petition for termination of parental rights.

Whether and, if applicable, when a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual will be appointed as a legal guardian.

Whether and, if applicable, to place siblings in the same foster care, relative, guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless it is determined that the joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

Whether and, if applicable, in the case of siblings removed from the home of the siblings who are not jointly placed, to provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless it is determined to be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

In cases in which a compelling reason has been shown that it would not be in the child’s best interests to return home, to have parental rights terminated, to be placed for adoption, to be placed with a fit and willing relative, or to be placed with a legal guardian, whether and, if applicable, when the child, aged sixteen or older, will be placed in another planned permanent living arrangement. The court shall:

Ask the child whether the child has a desired permanency outcome of another planned permanent living arrangement;

Make a judicial determination explaining why another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child; and

Identify the compelling reasons it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.

In the case of a child who has been placed in foster care outside the state in which the home of the parents is located, or if the parents maintain separate homes, outside the state in which the home of the parent who was the child’s primary caregiver is located, whether out-of-state placements have been considered. If the child is currently in an out-of-state placement, the court shall determine whether the placement continues to be appropriate and in the child’s best interests.

In the case of a child who has attained age fourteen, the services needed to assist the child to make the transition to successful adulthood.

“Qualified residential treatment programs” mean residential child care facilities that provide a higher level of care which must use a trauma-informed treatment model and employ registered or licensed nursing staff and other licensed clinical staff to meet the treatment needs of children in out-of-home placement.

“Referral” means a written report submitted to the director of juvenile court or the director of the human service zone concerning behavior without an arrest or taking into custody having occurred and the child remains in the parental home to be notified of any action taken by the director or human service zone as authorized in this chapter.

“Relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, half-sibling, aunt, great-aunt, uncle, great-uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child’s parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child’s community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child’s stepparent.

“Shelter care” means temporary care of a child in physically unrestricted facilities.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-01.
Definitions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause:

To communicate with the child; or

To provide for the care and support of the child as required by law; or

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

Willfully to fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Abandoned infant” means a child who has been abandoned before reaching the age of one year.

“Aggravated circumstances” means circumstances in which a parent:

Abandons, tortures, chronically abuses, or sexually abuses a child;

Fails to make substantial, meaningful efforts to secure treatment for the parent’s addiction, mental illness, behavior disorder, or any combination of those conditions for one year;

Engages in conduct prohibited under sections 12.1-20-01 through 12.1-20-08 or chapter 12.1-20-08, in which a child is the victim or intended victim;

Engages in conduct that constitutes one of the following crimes, or of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which requires proof of substantially similar elements:

A violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, 12.1-16-03, or 14-09-22 in which the victim is another child of the parent;

Aiding, abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting a violation of section 12.1-16-01, 12.1-16-02, or 12.1-16-03 in which the victim is a child of the parent; or

A violation of section 12.1-17-02 in which the victim is a child of the parent and has suffered serious bodily injury;

Engages or attempts to engage in conduct, prohibited under sections 12.1-17-01 through 12.1-17-04, in which a child is the victim or intended victim;

In the case of a child age nine or older, has been incarcerated under a sentence for which the latest release date is after the child’s age of majority;

Subjects the child to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner; or

Allows the child to be present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2.

“Attendant care” means a nonsecure holdover site for children in need of services who are in the custody of law enforcement and need constant short-term supervision on a preadjudicatory basis.

“Child in need of protection” means a child who:

Is without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and the need for services or protection is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned by the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Is without proper parental care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of the child’s parent or parents, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission by the child’s parents, and care is requested by a parent;

Is in need of treatment and whose parents, guardian, or other custodian have refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Child in need of services” means a child who:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school subject to compulsory school attendance and is absent from school without an authorized excuse more than three days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child’s parent, guardian, or other custodian, including running away, and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Has committed an offense applicable only to a child, except for an offense committed by a minor fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution; or

Is under the age of fourteen years and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, “electronic smoking device” and “alternative nicotine product” have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03; and

In any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, which stands in loco parentis to the child and a person to which legal custody of the child has been given by order of a court.

“Diversion” means an intervention strategy that redirects a child away from formal processing in the juvenile justice system, while still holding the child accountable for that child’s actions.

“Fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual” means a relative or other individual who has been determined, after consideration of an assessment that includes a criminal history record investigation under chapter 50-11.3, to be a qualified individual under chapters 27-20.1 and 30.1-27, and who consents in writing to act as a legal guardian.

“Home” as used in the phrase “to return home” means the abode of the child’s parent with whom the child formerly resided.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department of health and human services.

“Permanency hearing” means a hearing, conducted with respect to a child who is in foster care, to determine the permanency plan for the child which includes the following:

Whether and, if applicable, when the child will be returned to the parent.

Whether and, if applicable, when the child will be placed for adoption and the state will file a petition for termination of parental rights.

Whether and, if applicable, when a fit and willing relative or other appropriate individual will be appointed as a legal guardian.

Whether and, if applicable, to place siblings in the same foster care, relative, guardianship, or adoptive placement, unless it is determined that the joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

Whether and, if applicable, in the case of siblings removed from the home of the siblings who are not jointly placed, to provide for frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless it is determined to be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings.

In cases in which a compelling reason has been shown that it would not be in the child’s best interests to return home, to have parental rights terminated, to be placed for adoption, to be placed with a fit and willing relative, or to be placed with a legal guardian, whether and, if applicable, when the child, aged sixteen or older, will be placed in another planned permanent living arrangement. The court shall:

Ask the child whether the child has a desired permanency outcome of another planned permanent living arrangement;

Make a judicial determination explaining why another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the child; and

Identify the compelling reasons it continues not to be in the best interest of the child to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.

In the case of a child who has been placed in foster care outside the state in which the home of the parents is located, or if the parents maintain separate homes, outside the state in which the home of the parent who was the child’s primary caregiver is located, whether out-of-state placements have been considered. If the child is currently in an out-of-state placement, the court shall determine whether the placement continues to be appropriate and in the child’s best interests.

In the case of a child who has attained age fourteen, the services needed to assist the child to make the transition to successful adulthood.

“Qualified residential treatment programs” mean residential child care facilities that provide a higher level of care which must use a trauma-informed treatment model and employ registered or licensed nursing staff and other licensed clinical staff to meet the treatment needs of children in out-of-home placement.

“Referral” means a written report submitted to the director of juvenile court or the director of the human service zone concerning behavior without an arrest or taking into custody having occurred and the child remains in the parental home to be notified of any action taken by the director or human service zone as authorized in this chapter.

“Relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, half-sibling, aunt, great-aunt, uncle, great-uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child’s parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child’s community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child’s stepparent.

“Shelter care” means temporary care of a child in physically unrestricted facilities.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.3-02.
Jurisdiction.

Jurisdiction as set forth in section 27-20.2-03 is applicable to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-03.
Venue.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, a proceeding under this chapter must be commenced in the county in which the child resides. If the need for services or protection are alleged, the proceeding may be brought in the county in which the child is present at the time the proceeding is commenced, the county in which the child has resided for the majority of the thirty days before the date of the alleged need for services or protection, or the county in which the alleged need for services or protection has occurred. The court shall determine the appropriate venue for a child in need of services or a child in need of protection based on the best interest of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-04.
Powers and duties of director of juvenile court.

For the purpose of carrying out the objectives and purposes of this chapter and subject to the limitations of this chapter or imposed by the court, a director shall:

Make investigations, reports, and recommendations to the juvenile court.

Receive and examine referrals of a child in need of services or child in need of protection for the purpose of considering diversion of services.

Make a determination upon intake of referrals regarding the appropriate manner to handle delinquent conduct, a child in need of services, or a child in need of protection under this chapter.

Make appropriate referrals to other private or public agencies of the community if their assistance appears to be needed or desirable.

Issue a temporary custody order concerning a child who is referred to the director’s supervision or care as a child in need of services or a child in need of protection. Except as provided by this chapter, a director does not have the powers of a law enforcement officer.

Take acknowledgments of instruments for the purpose of this chapter.

Make such temporary order not to exceed ninety-six hours for the custody and control of a child alleged to be in need of services or protection as may be deemed appropriate. The order must be reduced to writing within twenty-four hours, excluding holidays and weekends.

Perform all other functions designated by this chapter or under section 27-05-30 or by order of the court, including, if qualified, those of a referee.

Issue an order to a law enforcement authority to transport a child to and from a specified location.

Receive and examine requests for review of a child’s placement at a qualified residential treatment program under the Family First Prevention Services Act [Pub. L. 115-123; 132 Stat. 64; 42 U.S.C. 675].

Any of the foregoing functions may be performed in another state if authorized by the court of this state and permitted by the laws of the other state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-05.
Method of making a child in need of services referral. [Effective through July 31, 2022]

A referral alleging a child is a child in need of services may be made by a parent, guardian or other custodian, a law enforcement officer, a school official, or any other person that has knowledge of the facts alleged and believes such facts are true.

A referral alleging a child is a child in need of services under section 27-20.2-01 must be sent to the juvenile court.

The referral must be set forth in writing and must set forth the following:

The name, date of birth, and residence address of the child alleged to be a child in need of services;

The names and residence addresses of the parent, guardian or legal custodian, any other family members, or any other individuals living within the child’s home;

The name of any public institution or agency having the responsibility or ability to supply services alleged to be needed by the child; and

Whether any of the matters required by this subsection are unknown.

If a school official is filing a referral alleging a child is a child in need of services, information must be included which shows:

The legally responsible school district has sought to resolve the expressed problem through all appropriate and available educational approaches; and

The school district has sought to engage the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of such child in solving the problem but such person has been unwilling or unable to do so, that the problem remains, and that court intervention is needed.

If a school official is filing a complaint alleging a child is a child in need of services involving a child who is eligible or suspected to be eligible for services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 1990 [20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.] or Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [29 U.S.C. 725], information must be included which demonstrates that the legally liable school district:

Has determined the child is eligible or suspected to be eligible under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 1990 [20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.] or Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [29 U.S.C. 725]; and

Has reviewed for appropriateness the child’s current individualized education program and placement and has made modifications as appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-05
Method of making a child in need of services referral. [Effective August 1, 2022]

A referral alleging a child is a child in need of services may be made by a parent, guardian or other custodian, a law enforcement officer, a school official, or any other person that has knowledge of the facts alleged and believes such facts are true.

A referral alleging a child is a child in need of services under section 27-20.2-01 must be sent to the juvenile court.

The referral must be set forth in writing and must set forth the following:

The name, date of birth, and residence address of the child alleged to be a child in need of services;

The names and residence addresses of the parent, guardian or legal custodian, any other family members, or any other individuals living within the child’s home;

The name of any public institution or agency having the responsibility or ability to supply services alleged to be needed by the child; and

Whether any of the matters required by this subsection are unknown.

If a school official is filing a referral alleging a child is a child in need of services, information must be included which shows:

The legally responsible school district has sought to resolve the expressed problem through all appropriate and available educational approaches; and

The school district has sought to engage the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of such child in solving the problem but such person has been unwilling or unable to do so, that the problem remains, and that court intervention is needed.

If a school official is filing a complaint alleging a child is a child in need of services involving a child who is eligible or suspected to be eligible for services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 1990 [20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.] or Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [29 U.S.C. 725], information must be included which demonstrates that the legally liable school district:

Has determined the child is eligible or suspected to be eligible under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 1990 [20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.] or Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 [29 U.S.C. 725]; and

Has reviewed for appropriateness the child’s current individualized education program and placement and has made modifications as appropriate.

A referral alleging that a child is a child in need of services under section 27-20.2-01 must be sent to the applicable human service zone.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 24, effective August 1, 2022.

27-20.3-06.
Taking into protective custody.

A child alleged to be in need of protection may be taken into protective custody:

Pursuant to an order of the court under this chapter;

By a law enforcement officer or designee if there are reasonable grounds to believe:

The child is suffering from illness or injury or is in immediate danger from the child’s surroundings, and the child’s removal is necessary; or

The child has run away from the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian; or

By order of the director made pursuant to section 27-20.3-04.

The taking of a child into protective custody is not an arrest, except for the purpose of determining the validity of the arrest under the Constitution of North Dakota or the United States Constitution.

A law enforcement officer may transport a child to and from attendant care.

Without a compelling reason to the contrary, a court order transferring a child into custody must provide a reasonable period of time to facilitate a beneficial transition for the child and other parties involved.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-07.
Shelter care of child.

A child taken into protective custody may not be placed in shelter care before the hearing on the petition unless the child’s care is required to protect a person or property of others or of the child or because the child may abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court or because the child has no parent, guardian or custodian, or other person able to provide supervision and care for the child and return the child to the court if required, or an order for the child’s shelter care has been made by the court pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-08.
Release or delivery to court.

A person taking a child into protective custody, with all reasonable speed and without first taking the child elsewhere, shall:

Release the child to the child’s parent, guardian, custodian, or other responsible adult able and willing to assume custody of the child, upon that person’s promise to bring the child before the court if requested by the court, unless the child’s shelter care is warranted or required; or

Bring the child before the court or deliver the child to a shelter care facility designated by the court or to a medical facility if the child is believed to suffer from a serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment. The person taking the child into custody promptly shall give notice of taking the child into custody, together with a statement of the reason for taking the child into custody, to a parent, guardian, or other custodian and to the court. Any questioning of the child necessary to comply with this subdivision must conform to the procedures and conditions prescribed by this chapter and rules of court.

If a parent, guardian, or other custodian, when requested, fails to bring the child before the court as provided in subsection 1, the court may issue a temporary custody order directing the child be taken into custody and brought before the court.

If the petition is not filed, the child must be released from shelter care.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-09.
Place of shelter care.

A child alleged to be in need of shelter care may be placed only in:

A licensed foster home or a home approved by the court;

A facility operated by a licensed child welfare agency; or

Any other suitable place or facility, including a medical facility for the treatment of mental illness, alcoholism, or drug addiction, designated by the court.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-10.
Release from shelter care — Hearing — Conditions of release.

If a child is brought before the court or delivered to a shelter care facility designated by the court, the director, an intake officer, or other authorized officer of the court or human service zone immediately shall make an investigation and release the child unless it appears that the child’s shelter care is warranted or required under section 27-20.3-07. If there is reason to believe the child may be an Indian child and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 [25 U.S.C. 1901 through 1963] may apply, the judge or referee may order the child be placed under the custody of the human service zone for a maximum of thirty days from the date of the emergency removal upon finding:

A return of the child to the parent or Indian custodian would subject the child to imminent danger or harm;

The court has been unable to transfer the proceeding to the appropriate Indian tribe; or

Holding an adjudicatory hearing is not possible.

If the child is not released, a judge or referee shall hold a shelter care hearing promptly and not later than ninety-six hours after the child is placed in shelter care to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the child is in need of protection and whether the child’s shelter care is required under section 27-20.3-07. Reasonable notice, either oral or written, stating the time, place, and purpose of the shelter care hearing must be given to the child and, if able to be found, to the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian. Before the commencement of the hearing, the court shall inform the parties of the rights of the parties to counsel and to counsel at public expense if the parties are indigent.

If continued shelter care is required, the judge or referee may order that the child be kept in shelter care for no more than sixty days from the date the child was placed in shelter care.

As a condition to the child’s release from shelter care, the court may order a parent, guardian, custodian, or any other member of the household in which the child resides to vacate the child’s residence if probable cause exists to believe that the parent, guardian, custodian, or other member of the household has committed a sexual offense with or against the child, pursuant to sections 12.1-20-03 through 12.1-20-07 or section 12.1-20-11, and the presence of the alleged sexual offender in the child’s residence presents a danger to the child’s life or physical, emotional, or mental health. The court may order that the parent, guardian, or custodian not allow contact with an identified person if the court determines the order is in the best interests of the child.

If the child is not released and a parent, guardian, or custodian has not been notified of the hearing, did not appear or waive appearance at the hearing, and files an affidavit showing these facts, the court shall rehear the matter without unnecessary delay and order the child’s release, unless it appears from the hearing that the child’s shelter care is required under section 27-20.3-07.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-11.
Diversion.

A child in need of services may be diverted.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-12.
Petition — Who may prepare and file — Review.

A petition alleging a child in need of protection must be prepared, filed, and served upon the parties by the state’s attorney. A petition may also be prepared by any other person, including a law enforcement officer, which has knowledge of the facts alleged or is informed and believes the facts are true. A petition prepared by any person other than a state’s attorney may not be filed unless the director or the court has determined the filing of the petition is in the best interest of the public and the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-13.
Conduct of child in need of protection hearings.

A hearing under this chapter must be conducted by the court without a jury, in an informal but orderly manner and separately from other proceedings not included in section 27-20.2-03 and in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

If the hearing has not been held within the time limit, or any extension of the time limit, required by supreme court rule, the petition must be dismissed.

The state’s attorney shall present the evidence in support of any allegations of the petition not admitted and otherwise conduct the proceedings on behalf of the state.

The proceedings must be recorded by stenographic notes or by electronic, mechanical, or other appropriate means.

Juvenile court hearings are closed to the public even if the purpose of the hearing is to declare a person in contempt of court. The general public must be excluded from other hearings under this chapter. In hearings from which the general public is excluded, only the parties, counsel of the parties, witnesses, victims, and any other persons the court finds have a proper interest in the proceedings may be admitted by the court. The court may temporarily exclude the child or other person from the hearing if, after being warned by the court that disruptive conduct will cause removal from the courtroom, the child or other person persists in conduct that justifies removal from the courtroom.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.3-14.
Adjudication.

If the court finds from clear and convincing evidence that the child is in need of protection, the court shall proceed immediately or at a postponed hearing to make a proper disposition of the case.

After hearing the evidence on the petition, the court shall make and file findings as to whether the child is in need of protection. If the court finds the child is not in need of protection, the court shall dismiss the petition and order the child discharged from any restriction previously ordered in the proceeding.

In hearings under this section, all evidence helpful in determining the questions presented, including oral and written reports, may be received by the court and relied upon to the extent of the probative value of the evidence even though not otherwise competent in the hearing on the petition. The parties or the counsel of the parties must be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making the reports. Sources of confidential information need not be disclosed.

On motion of the court or that of a party, the court may continue the hearings under this section for a reasonable period to receive reports and other evidence bearing on the disposition. In scheduling investigations and hearings the court shall give priority to proceedings in which a child has otherwise been removed from the child’s home before an order of disposition has been made.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 23, effective July 1, 2021.